Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 2. Mutual Fire Aid Agreements.

Collateral references. —

35A Am. Jur. 2d, Fires, §§ 5 — 10.

36A C.J.S., Fires, §§ 18, 19.

Police power as authorizing statute imposing upon owner or occupant liability for expense of fighting fire starting on his land or property. 90 ALR2d 873.

Sec. 18.70.150.
Adoption of mutual fire aid agreements.

A city, other incorporated entity, and other fire protection groups may organize a mutual-aid program by adopting an ordinance or resolution authorizing and permitting their fire department, fire company, emergency relief squad, fire police squad, or fire patrol to go to the aid of another city, incorporated entity, or fire protection group, or territory outside of it.
While extending aid under this section and AS

18.70.160

the fire department, company, squad, or patrol has the same privileges and immunities it possesses when it performs the same functions in its own area. The ordinance or resolution may authorize the heads of the fire department to extend aid, subject to conditions and restrictions prescribed in the ordinance or resolution.

History.

(§ 1 ch 92 SLA 1957)

Sec. 18.70.160.
Agreement not to affect insurance rates or liability.

An agreement made under AS

18.70.150

and this section shall be carried out in a manner that does not raise insurance rates. An agreement may not reduce the liability of an insurance company in case of loss during the absence of fire services personnel and equipment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 92 SLA 1957; am § 33 ch 35 SLA 2003)

Sec. 18.70.300.
[Renumbered as AS 18.70.900.]